Missouri, session 2026, HB1874.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.552, to read as follows:
537.552. 1. A person may bring a cause of action against a third party for
alienation of affection. The third party may be liable for civil damages, to be
determined by the court, to the person bringing such action.
2. (1) An action for alienation of affection shall be commenced within three
years from the last act of the third party giving rise to the cause of action.
(2) A person may commence a cause of action for alienation of affection against a
natural person only.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.